Arkansas, session 2025, SB605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 57, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 17 — Delta Tetrahydrocannabinol Excise Tax Act

26-57-1701. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Delta
Tetrahydrocannabinol Excise Tax Act".

26-57-1702. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, "Delta tetrahydrocannabinol product" means
a product that contains one (1) or more of the following:
(1) Hemp-derived cannabidiol that:
(A) Contains not more than three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%) of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) on a dry weight basis as
verified by a nationally accredited laboratory for quality, purity, and
accuracy standards; and
*JLL373*
04-07-2025 11:20:00 JLL373

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB605
(B) Is not approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for marketing as a medication; and
(2) Tetrahydrocannabinol, including without limitation the
following:
(A) Delta-1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, otherwise
known as a delta-9 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(B) Delta-6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, otherwise
known as a delta-8 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(C) Delta-3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, otherwise
known as a delta-6a,10a cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(D) Delta-10 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its
optical isomers;
(E) Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol acetate ester;
(F) Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol acetate ester;
(G) Delta-6a,10a tetrahydrocannabinol acetate ester;
(H) Delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol acetate ester;
(I) A product derived from industrial hemp that was
produced as a result of a synthetic chemical process that converted the
industrial hemp or a substance contained in the industrial hemp into delta-8,
delta-9, delta-6a,10a, or delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol including their
respective acetate esters; and
(J) Any other psychoactive substance derived therein.

26-57-1703. Applicability.
The excise tax levied under § 26-57-1704 applies to Delta
tetrahydrocannabinol products sold on and after the effective date of this
act.

26-57-1704. Excise taxes.
A seller shall collect and remit an excise tax of fifty percent (50%)
from the gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from each sale of a Delta
tetrahydrocannabinol product on the forms and in the manner specified by the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
04-07-2025 11:20:00 JLL373

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB605

26-57-1705. Imposition, reporting, remittance, and administration of
excise taxes.
Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the excise tax levied
under § 26-57-1704 shall be imposed, reported, remitted, and administered in
the same manner and at the same time as sales taxes under the Arkansas Gross
Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq.

26-57-1706. Administration of law.
This subchapter is subject to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-
101 et seq., as those provisions apply to the administration of this
subchapter by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration,
including without limitation the provisions regarding interest and penalty on
delinquent taxes.

26-57-1707. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may
promulgate rules to implement and allow for the enforcement of this
subchapter, including without limitation to identify products that are
subject to the excise tax levied under § 26-57-1704.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the second calendar month following the effective date of this
act.

/s/J. Dismang










04-07-2025 11:20:00 JLL373